Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB815.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 620.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions
of this chapter. The cabinet may also promulgate administrative regulations
pursuant to the requirements of Public Law 96-272 as to the maximum number of
children who at any time during a fiscal year, will remain in foster care after having
been in such care for a period in excess of twenty-four (24) months, together with
the steps to be taken to achieve such goal.
(2) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to provide the following:
(a) The method used to periodically review the status of children placed in foster
family homes which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
1. Within ten (10) calendar days of the temporary removal hearing
provided for in this chapter, a case conference shall be held on all
children placed with the cabinet for the purpose of establishing a
specific treatment plan which may include preventive and reunification
services for the child and his or her parent or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision. Additional case conferences and
reviews shall be held as appropriate, but shall be held at least every six
(6) months. The parent or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision and his or her counsel, if any, shall have the right to be
present at and participate in such conferences. The child; the child's
attorney, if any; the parent or other person exercising custodial control
or supervision and his or her attorney of record, if any; and the county
attorney shall be notified of, and may be present at and participate in
such conferences;
2. On-going case work and supportive services shall be provided as
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2441
indicated to best meet the needs of the child as established by the review
and planning process; and
3. There may be procedures for providing for appropriate visitation
between the parents and the child based on the needs of the child;
(b) The procedures for reporting to a committing court the status and plans for
children committed to the cabinet as dependent, neglected or abused and
placed in foster family homes;
(c) By January 1, 2019, the establishment and implementation of the processes,
procedures, and requirements to ensure that children committed to the cabinet
as dependent, neglected, or abused and placed in foster family homes are
timely reunified with their biological family or identified for and placed in a
new permanent home. These processes, procedures, and requirements shall
include but not be limited to the following:
1. A case review and recommendation submitted to the committing court
related to whether the best interest of the child is reunification or
termination of parental rights after the child has been committed to the
cabinet a total of six (6) cumulative months;
2. An additional case review and recommendation submitted to the
committing court every three (3) cumulative months after the initial six
(6) months if a child is still in the custody of the cabinet;
3. A petition to the court of appropriate jurisdiction seeking the termination
of parental rights and authority to place the child for adoption in
accordance with this chapter and KRS Chapter 625 no later than after a
child has been committed to the cabinet for a total of fifteen (15)
cumulative months out of forty-eight (48) months; and
4. A plan to ensure, no longer than thirty (30) working days after a court
enters a judgment of termination of parental rights to a child that is
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2441
committed to the cabinet, that the cabinet shall complete and submit to
the court all necessary paperwork to facilitate the child's permanency
plan, including but not limited to the presentation summary and
identification of an adoptive home if determined; and
(d) By October 1, 2019, the establishment and implementation of the processes,
procedures, and requirements to ensure that children committed to the cabinet
as dependent, neglected, or abused and placed in qualified residential
treatment facilities are subject to case reviews within sixty (60) days of the
start of each placement in accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 675a(c)(2).
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 4:02 PM Jacketed